Tennessee, session 114, SB1260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
4-1-350. Hot chicken capital of Tennessee.
Nashville, Tennessee, is hereby designated as the hot chicken capital of this
state.
SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1260
000627
- 1 -